New Jersey, session 221, S4670.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) a.  The body of water currently known as Delaware Bay shall be renamed and thereafter referred to as the Bay of New Jersey. b.  All State departments, agencies, and instrumentalities shall: (1)  update their Internet websites to reflect this designation within 90 days of the effective date of P.L. , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); and (2)   update official publications, signage, advertisements, and any other public indicators to reflect this designation before ordering replacement publications, signage, advertisements, or other public indicators. c.  The Department of State shall notify all relevant federal agencies, including but not limited to the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and the United States Geological Survey, of this designation and shall request corresponding updates to federal publications and materials. d.  Whenever any reference is made in any law, rule, regulation, contract, or document to Delaware Bay, the same shall mean and refer to the Bay of New Jersey. 2.    Section 1 of P.L.1940, c.52 (C.12:6A-1) is amended to read as follows: In addition to the powers conferred by the provisions of the act to which this act is a supplement, the State Department of Conservation and Economic Development is hereby authorized and empowered to repair, reconstruct, or construct bulkheads, seawalls, breakwaters, groins, jetties, beachfills, dunes and any or all appurtenant structures and work, on any and every shore front along the Atlantic ocean, in the State of New Jersey, or any shore front along the [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey and Delaware river, Raritan bay, Barnegat bay, Sandy Hook bay, Shrewsbury river including Nevesink river, Shark river, and the coastal inland waterways extending southerly from Manasquan Inlet to Cape May Harbor, or at any inlet, estuary or tributary waterway or any inland waterways adjacent to any inlet, estuary or tributary waterway along the shores of the State of New Jersey, to prevent or repair damage caused by erosion and storm, or to prevent erosion of the shores and to stabilize the inlets or estuaries and to undertake  any and all actions and work essential to the execution of this authorization  and the powers granted hereby. (cf: P.L.1966, c.212, s.1) 3.    Section 4 of P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-4) is amended to read as follows: The South Jersey Port District is hereby created and shall embrace the counties of Mercer, Burlington, Camden, Gloucester, Salem, Cumberland and Cape May and all the lands and waters in the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey contiguous thereto, subject to the right, title and interest of the State in and to the lands under the waters of the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey. (cf: P.L.1968, c.60, s.4) 4.    Section 6 of P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.  The corporation shall be a body corporate and politic and shall have perpetual succession and shall have the following powers: (a)  To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business; (b)  To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure; (c)  To maintain an office at such place or places within the district as it  may designate; (d)  To sue and be sued in its own name; (e)  To establish, acquire, construct, rehabilitate, improve, own, operate and maintain marine terminals at such locations within the district as it shall  determine; (f)  To enter into lease agreements with private marine terminal operators for the purpose of operating and maintaining any of the marine terminals established, acquired, owned, constructed, rehabilitated or improved by the corporation; (g)  To issue bonds or notes of the corporation for any of its corporate purposes and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof as provided in this act; (h)  To fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect rents, tolls, fees and charges for use of the several functions and services of any marine terminal acquired or constructed by it; (i)  To establish rules and regulations for the use of any terminal; (j)  To acquire, hold and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under this act; (k)  To acquire in the name of the corporation by purchase or otherwise, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any land and other property which it may determine is reasonably necessary for any marine terminal or for the relocation or reconstruction of any highway by the corporation and any and all rights, title and interest in such land and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways or parkways, owned by or in which any county, city, borough, town, township, village, or other political subdivision of the State of New Jersey has any right, title or interest, or parts thereof or rights therein and any fee simple absolute or any lesser interest in private property, and any fee simple absolute in, easements upon, or the benefit of restrictions upon, abutting property to preserve and protect any marine terminal. Upon the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the compensation to be paid thereunder shall be ascertained and paid in the manner provided in the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), insofar as the provisions thereof are applicable and not inconsistent with the provisions contained in this act. The  corporation may join in separate subdivisions in one petition or complaint the descriptions of any number of tracts or parcels of land or property to be condemned and the names of any number of owners and other parties who may have an interest therein and all such land or property included in said petition or complaint may be condemned in a single proceeding; provided, however, that separate awards be made for each tract or parcel of land or property; and provided further, that each of said tracts or parcels of land or property lies wholly in or has a substantial part of its value lying wholly within the same county. Upon the filing of such petition or complaint or at any time thereafter the corporation may file with the clerk of the county in which such property is located and also with the Clerk of the Superior Court a declaration of taking, signed by the corporation declaring that possession of one or more of the  tracts or parcels of land or property described in the petition or complaint is thereby being taken by and for the use of the corporation.  The said declaration of taking shall be sufficient if it sets forth (1) a description of each tract or parcel of land or property to be so taken sufficient for the identification thereof to which there shall be attached a plan or map thereof;  (2) a statement of the estate or interest in the said land or property being taken; (3) a statement of the sum of money estimated by the corporation by  resolution to be just compensation for the taking of the estate or interest in each tract or parcel of land or property described in said declaration; and (4) that, in compliance with the provisions of this act, the corporation has established and is maintaining a trust fund as hereinafter provided. Upon the filing of the said declaration, the corporation shall deposit with the Clerk of the Superior Court the amount of the estimated compensation stated in said declaration.  In addition to the said deposits with the Clerk of the Superior Court the corporation at all times shall maintain a special trust fund on deposit with a bank or trust company doing business in this State in an  account at least equal to twice the aggregate amount deposited with the Clerk of the Superior Court as estimated compensation for all property described in declarations of taking with respect to which the compensation has not been finally determined and paid to the persons entitled thereto or into court.  Said trust fund shall consist of cash or securities readily convertible into cash constituting legal investment for trust funds under the laws of this State.  Said trust fund shall be held solely to secure and may be applied to the payment of just compensation for the land or other property described in such declarations of taking.  The corporation shall be entitled to withdraw from said trust fund from time to time so much as may then be in excess of twice the aggregate of the amount deposited with the Clerk of the Superior Court as estimated compensation for all property described in declarations of taking with respect to which the compensation has not been finally determined  and paid to the persons entitled thereto or into court. Upon the filing of the said declaration as aforesaid and depositing with the Clerk of the Superior Court the amount of the estimated compensation stated in said declaration, the corporation without other process or proceedings, shall be entitled to the exclusive possession and use of each tract of land or property described in said declaration and may forthwith enter into and take possession of said land or property, it being the intent of this provision that the proceedings for compensation or any other proceedings relating to the taking of said land or interest therein or other property shall not delay the taking of possession thereof and the use thereof by the corporation for the  purpose or purposes for which the corporation is authorized by law to acquire or condemn such land or other property or interest therein. The corporation shall cause notice of the filing of said declaration and the making of said deposit to be served upon each party in interest named in the petition residing in this State, either personally or by leaving a copy thereof  at his residence, if known, and upon each party in interest residing out of the State, by mailing a copy thereof to him at his residence, if known.  In the event that the residence of any such party or the name of such party is unknown, such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper published or circulating in the county or counties in which the land is located.  Such service, mailing or publication shall be made within 10 days after filing such  declaration.  Upon the application of any party in interest and after notice to other parties in interest, including the corporation, any judge of the Superior Court assigned to sit for said county may order that the money deposited with the Clerk of the Superior Court or any part thereof be paid forthwith to the person or persons entitled thereto for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in said proceeding; provided, that each such person shall have filed with the Clerk of the Superior Court a consent in writing that, in the event the award in the condemnation proceeding shall be less than the amount deposited, the court, after notice as herein provided and hearing, may determine his liability, if any, for the return of such difference or any part  thereof and enter judgment therefor.  If the amount of the award as finally determined shall exceed the amount so deposited, the person or persons to whom the award is payable shall be entitled to recover from the corporation the difference between the amount of the deposit and the amount of the award, with interest at the rate of 6% per annum thereon from the date of making the deposit.  If the amount of the award shall be less than the amount so deposited, the Clerk of the Superior Court shall return the difference between the amount of the award and the deposit to the corporation unless the amount of the deposit or any part thereof shall have theretofore been distributed, in  which event the court, on petition of the corporation and notice to all persons interested in the award and affording them an opportunity to be heard, shall enter judgment in favor of the corporation for such difference against the party or parties liable for the return thereof.  The corporation shall cause notice of the date fixed for such hearing to be served upon each party thereto residing in this State either personally or by leaving a copy thereof at his residence, if known, and upon each party residing out of the State by mailing a copy to him at his residence, if known.  In the event that the residence of any party or the name of such party is unknown, such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper published or circulating in the county or counties in which the land is located.  Such service, mailing or publication shall be made at least 10 days before the date fixed for such hearing. Whenever under the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971" the amount of the award may be paid into court, payment may be made into the Superior Court and may be distributed according to law.  The corporation shall not abandon any condemnation proceeding subsequent to the date upon which it has taken possession of the land or property as herein provided; (l)  To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this act; (m)  To appoint such additional officers, who need not be members of the corporation as the corporation deems advisable, and to employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment; to fix their compensation; and to promote and discharge such officers, employees and agents; all without regard to the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes; provided, however that in the hiring of any employees or agents the corporation shall hire any full-time employees of the Camden Marine Terminals or of the South Jersey Port Commission, dissolved as hereinafter provided by this act, who express a desire to be employed by the corporation; and provided further, that the corporation shall provide for the protection and maintenance of any contract, agreement or memorandum of understanding concerning wages, working conditions or benefits of any nature whatsoever between said Camden Marine Terminals or South Jersey Port Commission and such employees or their designated representative, and the corporation shall guarantee any pension rights or benefits, including membership in any State, private or other pension plan, of any such employees of the Camden Marine Terminals or the South Jersey Port Commission; (n)  To apply for, receive and accept from any federal agency, subject to the approval of the Governor, grants for or in aid of the planning or construction of any marine terminal, and to receive and accept aid or contributions from any source, of either money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made; (o)  To acquire any lands under water in the State of New Jersey for marine terminal, purposes by grant, transfer or conveyance from the Resource Development Council in the Department of Conservation and Economic Development in accordance with the statutes of the State governing the making of riparian grants and leases, upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by said council; (p)  To acquire any real property required or used for State highway purposes in the State of New Jersey, by grant, transfer or conveyance from the State Department of Transportation of the State of New Jersey upon such terms and  conditions as may be determined by said State Department of Transportation; (q)  To promote the use of the port facilities in the district and the use of the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey as a highway of commerce and in furtherance of such promotion to make expenditures in the United States and foreign countries, to pay commissions, and hire or contract with experts and consultants, and  otherwise to do indirectly anything which the corporation may do directly; (r)  To co-operate with all other bodies interested or concerned with, or affected by the promotion, development or use of the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey and the port district; (s)  To enter into contracts and agreements with the Delaware River Port Authority or any other regional agency concerned with marine terminal purposes providing for joint participation by the parties in any undertaking for marine terminal purposes authorized by this act; (t)  Subject to the terms of any agreement by the corporation with the holders of bonds and notes and in the interests of promoting and establishing unity of authority in the control, development and over the use of the port facilities of the district, to lend, lease, grant or convey to or merge or consolidate with any other regional agency concerned with marine terminal purposes upon such terms and conditions and with such reservations as the corporation shall deem reasonable and fair, any marine terminal or part thereof  or any port facility or property which it owns or controls, provided, however, that the corporation shall not act under this subsection until it has submitted  to the Legislature any proposed loan, lease, grant or conveyance to or merger with any other regional agency of any marine terminal or port thereof or any other port facility which it owns or controls, and the Legislature has expressed its approval thereof in the form of a concurrent resolution expressing such approval passed by both houses of the Legislature, provided, however, that no such approval shall be required for any action of the corporation or otherwise, pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1997, c.150 (C.34:1B-144 et al.); (u)  Subject to the terms of any agreement by the corporation with the holders of bonds and notes, to lend, lease, transfer, grant or convey to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority any port facility, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1997, c.150 (C.34:1B-146), which is under its jurisdiction, ownership or control; (v)  To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this act. (cf: P.L.1997, c.150, s.21) 5.    Section 8 of P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-8) is amended to read as follows: In order to facilitate the development of port facilities in the areas of this State bordering on the tidal reaches of the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey the South Jersey Port Corporation is hereby authorized and empowered to establish, acquire, construct, rehabilitate, improve, own, operate and maintain marine terminals at such locations within the South Jersey Port District as it shall determine. (cf: P.L.1968, c.60, s.8) 6.    Section 9 of P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-9) is amended to read as follows: In order to further facilitate the development of port facilities in the areas of this State bordering on the tidal reaches of the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey and to further the development of commerce and industry in this State, the South Jersey Port Corporation is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into lease agreements with private marine terminal operators whereby the marine terminals established, acquired, constructed, rehabilitated, improved, owned, operated or maintained by the corporation may be operated and maintained by such private marine terminal operators. The exercise of this power to lease marine terminals shall be in the uncontrolled discretion of the corporation, and nothing in this act is to be construed as requiring the leasing of any marine terminal by the corporation. (cf: P.L.1968, c.60, s.9) 7.    Section 2 of P.L.1970, c.272 (C.13:9A-2) is amended to read as follows: The Commissioner may from time to time, for the purpose of promoting the public safety, health and welfare, and protecting public and private property, wildlife and marine fisheries, adopt, amend, modify or repeal orders regulating, restricting or prohibiting dredging, filling, removing or otherwise  altering, or polluting, coastal wetlands.  For the purposes of this act the  term  "coastal wetlands"  shall mean any bank, marsh, swamp, meadow, flat or  other low land subject to tidal action in the State of New Jersey along the [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey and Delaware river, Raritan bay, Barnegat bay, Sandy Hook bay, Shrewsbury river including Navesink river, Shark river, and the coastal inland waterways extending southerly from Manasquan Inlet to Cape May Harbor, or at any inlet, estuary or tributary waterway or any thereof, including those areas now or formerly connected to tidal waters whose surface is at or below an elevation of 1 foot above local extreme high water, and upon which may grow or is capable of growing some, but not necessarily all, of the following:  Salt meadow grass (Spartine patens), spike grass (Distichlis spicata), black grass (Juncus gerardi), saltmarsh grass (Spartina alterniflora), saltworts (Salicornia Europaea, and Salicornia bigelovii), Sea Lavendar (Limonium carolinianum), saltmarsh bulrushes (Scirpus robustus and Scirpus paludosus var.  atlanticus), sand spurrey (Spergularia marina), switch grass (Panicum virgatum), tall cordgrass (Spartina pectinata), hightide bush (Iva frutescens var. oraria), cattails (Typha angustifolia, and Typha latifolia), spike rush (Eleocharis rostellata), chairmaker's rush (Scirpus americana), bent grass (Agrostis palustris), and sweet grass (Hierochloe odorata).  The term "coastal wetlands"  shall not include any land or real property subject to the jurisdiction of the Hackensack Meadowlands Development Commission pursuant to  the provisions of P.L.1968, chapter 404, sections 1 through 84 (C. 13:17-1  through C. 13:17-86). (cf: P.L.1970, c.272, s.2) 8.    Section 4 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-4) is amended to read as follows: 4. The "coastal area" shall consist of all that certain area lying between the line as hereinafter described and the line formed by the State's seaward (Raritan Bay and Atlantic Ocean) territorial jurisdiction on the east thereof, the State's bayward [(Delaware Bay)] (Bay of New Jersey) territorial jurisdiction on the south and southwest thereof, and the State's riverward (Delaware River) territorial jurisdiction on the west thereto.  Beginning at the confluence of Cheesequake Creek with the Raritan Bay; thence southwesterly along the center line of Cheesequake Creek to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway; thence southeasterly along the Garden State Parkway to Exit 117 at State Highway 36; thence northeasterly along State Highway 36 to the intersection of Middle Road (County 516); thence easterly along Middle Road to the intersection of Palmer Avenue (County 7); thence northeasterly on Main Street to the intersection of State Highway 36; thence easterly on State Highway 36 to the intersection of Navesink Avenue; thence southerly on Navesink Avenue to the intersection of Monmouth Avenue at Navesink; thence westerly on Monmouth Avenue to its intersection with Browns Dock Road; thence southerly on Browns Dock Road to its intersection with Cooper Road; thence southwesterly on Cooper Road to the intersection of State Highway 35; thence southerly on State Highway 35 to its intersection with State Highway 71; thence southeasterly on State Highway 71 to its crossing of the Central Railroad of New Jersey tracks, now the Consolidated Rail Corporation (Conrail)/New Jersey Transit Corporation (NJ Transit); thence southerly along the Central Railroad of New Jersey tracks (now Conrail/NJ Transit) to its intersection of 6th Avenue (County 2); thence westerly on 6th Avenue (County 2) to the intersection of State Highway 33; thence westerly along State Highway 33 to the crossing of State Highway 18; thence southerly on State Highway 18 to its intersection of Marconi Road; thence southeasterly on Marconi Road to Adrienne Road, continuing south on Adrienne Road to Belmar Boulevard; thence easterly on Belmar Boulevard and 16th Avenue to the intersection of State Highway 71; thence southerly on State Highway 71 to the intersection of State Highway 35; thence northwesterly along State Highway 35 to State Highway 34 at the Brielle Circle; thence northwesterly along State Highway 34 to the Garden State Parkway at Exit 96; thence southwesterly along the Garden State Parkway to the intersection of the Monmouth, Ocean County boundary; thence westerly along that boundary to the intersection of the Central Railroad of New Jersey tracks (now Conrail); thence southwesterly along the tracks of the Central Railroad of New Jersey (now Conrail) to its junction with the tracks of the Pennsylvania Railroad near Whiting; thence easterly along the tracks of the Pennsylvania Railroad to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway near South Toms River; thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with the boundary of the Bass River State Forest; thence southerly, and thence westerly, along the Bass River State Forest to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway in Bass River Township; thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with Alt. 559, and thence northwesterly along Alt. 559 to its intersection with County Road 559 at Gravelly Run; thence northwesterly along County Road 559 to its intersection with U.S. 40 and S.R. 50 at Mays Landing; thence westerly along combined U.S. 40 and S.R. 50 to its intersection with S.R. 40; thence westerly along S.R.40 to its intersection with S.R.50; thence southerly on S.R. 50 to its intersection with Buck Hill Road near Buck Hill; thence westerly along Buck Hill (River Road also Head of River Road and Aetna Drive) Road to its intersection with S.R. 49; thence southeasterly along S.R. 49 to its intersection with S.R. 50; thence southeasterly along S.R. 50 to its intersection with County Road 585 (now County Road 610); thence southwesterly along County Road 585 (now County Road 610) to its intersection with S.R. 47 at Dennisville; thence northwesterly along S.R. 47 to its intersection with State Road 49 at Millville; thence through Millville along State Road 49 to its intersection with County Road 610 (Cedar Street); thence southwesterly along County Road 610 (Cedar Street) to its intersection with County Road 555 (Race Street); thence southerly along County Road 555 (Race Street) to its intersection with County Road 27 (now County Road 627); thence southerly along County Road 27 (now County Road 627) to its intersection with County Road 70 (now County Road 670); thence southerly on County Road 70 (now County Road 670) to the Center of Mauricetown; thence through Mauricetown westerly on County Road 548 (now County Road 676) to its intersection with the tracks of the Central Railroad of New Jersey (now Conrail); thence northwesterly on the tracks of the Central Railroad of New Jersey (now Conrail) to its intersection with County Road 98 (now County Road 698); thence easterly along County Road 98 (now County Road 698) to the intersection with County Road 38 (now County Road 638); thence northerly along County Road 38 (now County Road 638) to its intersection with S.R. 49 east of Bridgeton; thence westerly along S.R. 49 through Bridgeton to its intersection with West Avenue; thence south on West Avenue to its intersection with County Road 5 (Roadstown Road) (now County Road 626); thence westerly along County Road 5 (Roadstown Road) (now County Road 626) to Roadstown; thence northwesterly along the Roadstown Road to County Road 47 (now County Road 647); thence southwesterly along County Road 47 (now County Road 647) to its intersection with County Road 19 (now County Road 623); thence along County Road 19 (now County Road 623) northwesterly to Gum Tree Corner; thence northwesterly along County Road 19 (now County Road 623) from Gum Tree Corner across Stowe Creek to its intersection with Salem County Road 59 (now County Road 623) (Hancock's Bridge Road); thence northwesterly along County Road 59 (now County Road 623) to its intersection with County Road 51 (now County Road 651) at Coopers Branch; thence northeasterly along County Road 51 (now County Road 651) to its intersection with S.R. 49 at Quinton; thence northwesterly along S.R. 49 to its intersection with County Road 50 (now County Road 650); thence southwesterly along County Road 50 (now County Road 650) to its intersection with County Road 58 (now County Road 658); thence southerly on County Road 58 (now County Road 658) to its intersection with County Road 24 (now County Road 624); thence westerly along County Road 24 (now County Road 624) to its intersection with County Road 65 (now County Road 637); thence northeasterly along County Road 65 (now County Road 637) to its intersection with County Road 665 (Walnut Street); thence northerly along County Road 65 (now County Road 665) (Walnut Street) to its intersection with County Road 4 (now County Road 633); thence westerly along County Road 4 (now County Road 633) to its intersection with County Road 627; thence northerly along County Road 627 to its intersection with County Road 661; thence easterly along County Road 661 to its intersection with State Road 49; thence northerly along State Road 49 (Front Street) to its intersection with County Road 57 (now County Road 657); thence easterly along County Road 57 (now County Road 657) to its intersection with State Road 45; thence northerly along State Road 45 to its intersection with County Road 540 at Pointers; thence northerly and northwesterly along County Road 540 (Pointers Auburn Road/Deepwater-Slapes Corner Road) to its intersection with the New Jersey Turnpike; thence westerly along the New Jersey Turnpike to its intersection with County Road 33 (now County Road 551); thence southerly along County Road 33 (now County Road 551) to its intersection with State Road 49; thence southeasterly along S.R. 49 to its intersection with County Road 26 (now County Road 632); thence northwesterly along County Road 26 (now County Road 632) to the Killcohook National Wildlife Refuge; thence northwesterly along this northeasterly boundary to the limits of the State's territorial jurisdiction on the Delaware River; provided, however, that the coastal area shall not include all that certain area in Cape May county lying within a line beginning at the intersection of S.R. 47 and County Road 54 (now County Road 654); thence westerly on County Road 54 (now County Road 654); to the intersection of County Road 3 (now County Road 603); thence southeasterly on County Road 3 (now County Road 603) through the intersection of County Road 3 (now County Road 603) with County Road 13 (now County Road 639) to the intersection with County Road 47 (now County Road 647); thence easterly and northerly along County Road 47 (now County Road 647) to its intersection with U.S. Route 9; thence northerly along U.S. Route 9 to its intersection with State Road 47; thence westerly along State Road 47 to its intersection with County Road 54 (now County Road 654). (cf: P.L.1993, c.190, s.4) 9.    Section 1 of P.L.2008, c.1 (C.23:2B-20) is amended to read as follows: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that each spring more than a million shorebirds of six species, including the red knot, ruddy turnstone, sanderling, semipalmated sandpiper, short-billed dowitcher, and dunlin, stop at [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey beaches and feed upon horseshoe crab eggs; that the red knot was once considered one of New Jersey's most abundant shorebirds; that this critical food source of horseshoe crab eggs consumed during the stopover of the red knot in New Jersey and Delaware is needed for the birds to gain sufficient weight to continue their migration north to breeding grounds in the Canadian Arctic, survive until food becomes available, and successfully reproduce ; that surveys have shown that red knots migrating through the bay region have declined by more than 75 percent since 2000; and that state and international biologists fear that the red knot will become extinct as soon as 2010. The Legislature further finds and declares that the numbers of shorebirds other than the red knots that feed on horseshoe crab eggs on the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey have declined by a highly significant 64 percent during the period of 1998 through 2007. The Legislature further finds and declares that shorebird populations have continued to decline, despite the fact that over the past two decades more than $3 million in public funds have been spent on the protection and restoration of shorebird populations and their habitats on [New Jersey's Delaware] Bay of New Jersey shore. The Legislature therefore determines that a moratorium on the harvest, landing and possession of horseshoe crabs is critical to ensure that more horseshoe crab eggs will be available as a food source, thus increasing the likelihood of survival of these shorebirds. (cf: P.L.2008, c.1, s.1) 10.  Section 8 of P.L.1996, c.112 (C.23:3-12.2) is amended to read as follows: 8. a. There is established within the "hunters' and anglers' license fund," created pursuant to the provisions of R.S.23:3-11 and R.S.23:3-12, a separate and dedicated account to be known as the "Oyster Resource Development Account."  This account shall be credited with all revenues received from oysters landed from the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey and their tributaries, including, but not limited to, all fees collected pursuant to R.S.50:1-18, R.S.50:3-2, and section 4 of P.L.1945, c.39 (C.50:3-20.13), and as provided in subsection c. of this section.  The moneys in the account shall be allocated to the Division of Fish and Wildlife within the Department of Environmental Protection and shall be disbursed only for the enhancement and management of the oyster resource in the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey in the amounts and manner prescribed by the commissioner, after consultation with the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council. b.    The Department of Environmental Protection shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to administer the "Oyster Resource Development Account," established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.     Upon the adoption of the rules and regulations pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the Department of Environmental Protection shall repeal subchapter 4 of chapter 25A of Title 7 of the New Jersey Administrative Code establishing the "oyster cultch program" and the "Oyster Cultch Fund." The balance of the moneys remaining in the "Oyster Cultch Fund" upon the date of the repeal of the rules and regulations establishing the fund shall be deposited in the "Oyster Resource Development Account," established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.4) 11.  R.S.23:3-51 is amended to read as follows: 23:3-51. a. Any person who intends to take menhaden with a purse seine or shirred net from any State waters, including the waters of the Atlantic ocean within three nautical miles of the State coast line, shall apply to the commissioner for a Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel License or a Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel Operator's License, as appropriate, in accordance with the provisions of this section.  Upon receipt of the application and payment of the fee required pursuant to R.S.23:3-52, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion and as prescribed pursuant to sections 2 and 3 of P.L.2010, c.72, issue to the applicant a Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel License or a Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel Operator's License, as appropriate, except as prohibited by subsection b. of this section.  A license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid only for the calendar year for which it is issued, and shall be renewed on an annual basis. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, the provisions of P.L.2013, c.74 (C.23:3-51.2 et al.), or the provisions of any other law, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, the commissioner shall not issue a license for the taking of menhaden, and no person shall take menhaden, from State coastal waters, including the Delaware, Great, Raritan, and Sandy Hook bays, for the purpose of reduction, including the conversion of menhaden to fish meal, oil, or other components. This subsection shall not be understood to prohibit the taking of menhaden in State coastal waters for the use as bait for commercial or recreational purposes or in whole frozen form for use as human food. c. (1) The following types of vessels, and their owners or operators, are subject to licensure pursuant to this section: (a)   Any purse seine catch vessel that takes menhaden from State waters on an individual trip basis; and (b)   Any purse seine carry vessel that works in conjunction with the purse seine catch vessel identified in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph. (2)   A menhaden set vessel that participates only in the setting of a purse seine or shirred net in conjunction with a purse seine catch vessel is exempt from licensure pursuant to this section. (3)   A license issued pursuant to this section shall remain on board the licensed vessel at all times. (4)   The holder of a license issued pursuant to this section shall not use, have on board the licensed vessel, or work in conjunction with any other vessel that uses any type of fishing gear other than a purse seine or shirred net. d.    A Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel License shall be issued in the name of the vessel and the vessel's owner or owner/operator.  If the vessel owner is not the operator of the vessel, a Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel License shall be issued to the vessel owner, as provided in this paragraph, and a separate Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel Operator's License shall be issued to, and in the name of, the vessel operator, in accordance with the provisions of this section and subsection c. of R.S.23:3-52. e. (1) No vessel licensed pursuant to this section shall be greater than 90 feet in overall length. (2)   Whenever a Menhaden Purse Seine Fishing Vessel License is issued for a menhaden purse seine catch vessel pursuant to this section, the licensee shall provide the commissioner with certified baseline data indicating the overall length and horsepower of the vessel.  Any upgrade or replacement of a licensed purse seine catch vessel shall be limited to a 10 percent increase in overall vessel length, and a 20 percent increase in horsepower. f.     The possession of any fish other than menhaden on a vessel licensed under this section is limited to no more than 500 pounds.  The simultaneous possession aboard a vessel of a purse seine or shirred net, menhaden, and any other fish in an amount greater than 500 pounds shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this subsection. g. (1) Before commencing menhaden fishing activities on any given day, a person licensed under this section shall notify the department, by phone or, if applicable and offered by the department, by electronic means, of the intention to fish under this section, and the vessel's intended fishing location.  The licensee shall also notify the department, by phone or, if applicable and offered by the department, by electronic means, of any anticipated change in the vessel's fishing location.  After a licensee has provided notice to the department of their intention to fish for menhaden pursuant to this section on any particular day, the licensee shall be limited, on that day, to the use of a purse seine or shirred net. (2)   Fishing for menhaden pursuant to this section shall be restricted to those areas in the Raritan, Sandy Hook, and [Delaware Bays] the Bay of New Jersey, and in the Atlantic Ocean, which are located at a distance of 0.6 nautical miles or more from the New Jersey coastline and the jetties and fishing piers extending therefrom. (3)   Fishing for menhaden in the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey shall be further restricted to those areas of the Bay that lie south and east of LORAN C line 42850, or to any other area of the Bay, as may be designated by the commissioner. (4)   It shall be incumbent upon the vessel operator to determine whether a purse seine or shirred net is likely to drift, during fishing, beyond the fishing boundaries established by this subsection.  The drifting of a purse seine or shirred net into any restricted area along the shore or around a jetty or pier while fishing shall constitute a violation of this subsection. h.    No person engaged in the act of fishing pursuant to this section shall disturb any:  (a) channel designating stakes, markers, or buoys; (b) crab pots, lobster pots, fish pots, or traps; or (c) staked and leased shellfish grounds. (cf: P.L.2013, c.74, s.2) 12.  Section 1 of P.L.1979, c.227 (C.23:3-72) is amended to read as follows: No person shall take more than 25 American eels (anguilla rostrata) per day from the waters of [Delaware bay] the Bay of New Jersey and its tributaries in this State without first having obtained a valid commercial eel fishing license from the division.  The fee for such license shall be $100.00 for residents of this State;  for  nonresidents, the fee for such license shall be the same as the fee charged to  New Jersey residents by the state of residence of the license purchaser for a  comparable license, but shall not be less than $100.00.  Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be void after December 31 next succeeding its  issuance. (cf: P.L.1979, c.227, s.1) 13.  Section 2 of P.L.1979, c.227 (C.23:3-73) is amended to read as follows: The Director of the Division of Fish, Game and Shellfisheries, with the approval of the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, is hereby authorized to adopt, amend and repeal, pursuant to the  "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c. 410 (C. 52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as are necessary and proper in order to provide for the conservation, protection and management of the eel resource in the waters of [Delaware bay] the Bay of New Jersey and its tributaries in this State. (cf: P.L.1979, c.227, s.2) 14.  Section 2 of P.L.2001, c.429 (C.27:1A-76) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     There should be a single State agency for New Jersey's maritime industry charged with advancing Statewide maritime development initiatives and technologies, planning for maritime systems, enhancing New Jersey's marine environment, fostering maritime education, and providing overall support functions to the maritime industry in close coordination with the Department of Environmental Protection, the New Jersey Commerce and Economic Growth Commission, and other State agencies. b.    New Jersey's maritime industry is a $50 billion industry supporting more than 300,000 New Jersey citizens.  The industry is located along 127 miles of New Jersey shoreline, on 116 State navigation channels, 240 miles of navigable waterways in New York Harbor, and along 106 miles of the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey. Throughout the State, warehousing, manufacturing and cargo handling facilities service the commerce taking place along these water highways, and the intermodal connections which service them support local, national and international port commerce.  The industry includes boat-building companies, members of the marine trades' associations, marinas, the commercial and recreational fishing industry, science, technology, and educational and related services.  It also includes those industries that support waterborne military operations and national security initiatives. c.     The infrastructure required to support New Jersey's commercial and recreational maritime industry is collectively designated as New Jersey's Marine Transportation System.  It is a comprehensive system which includes navigable channels, waterborne commerce, dredging and dredged material management technologies, berth, terminal and related structures, intermodal transportation facilities and corridors, shipping, receiving and cargo-movement tracking systems, global positioning systems, vessel traffic and port information systems, physical oceanographic real-time systems, and geographical information systems.  Navigation aides, boat building technologies, ocean habitat tracking systems and other new technologies interact to create a seamless system linking all aspects of the maritime industry into a single transportation matrix.  The Marine Transportation System provides economic value, State and national security support, environmental protection and recreational opportunity for the State, the region and the nation. d.    Water transportation systems are a desirable, necessary and environmentally beneficial means of moving people and goods and such systems will promote the development and redevelopment of the State's urban centers.  It is further declared that in a densely settled state such as New Jersey, it should be a priority of the Department of Transportation to promote the development of water transportation systems and to provide, as necessary for the public safety and welfare, for the coordination and facilitation of water transportation systems. (cf: P.L.2001, c.429, s.2) 15. State Highway Route No. 4, S-4, S-4-A, S-4-B AND S-4-C, as established and described in  R.S.27:6-1, is redesignated to consist of and be described as follows: Hudson river bridge plaza to Perth Amboy and Cape May.  Beginning at the Hudson river bridge plaza and extending to Cape May City, via Riverside, Fairlawn, Paterson, Clifton, Bloomfield road, and Broad street via Bloomfield, East Orange, Irvington, Roselle, to Route No. 27 in Linden, Rahway, Woodbridge, Perth Amboy, South Amboy, via Main street and its extensions to Rose's Corner, Cheesquake, to a point at or near White Brown's Corner, thence to Middlesex road in th50:3-20e borough of Matawan, thence via Middlesex road to Main street, Matawan, thence via Freehold, Lakewood, Toms River, Tuckerton, Absecon, thence by New road to Somers' Point, Beesley's Point to Cape May.  S-4, extending from the proposed plaza of the Staten Island bridge at Perth Amboy to Route No. 4.  S-4-A, extending from Route No. 4 at or near Tuckerton and extending to a point on Little Beach;  provided, however, the county of Atlantic shall first agree to construct a suitable continuation of said road from Little Beach to the city of  Atlantic City.  S-4-B, beginning on Route No. 4 in the borough of Fairlawn,  extending northwesterly in the vicinity of Paterson, Hawthorne, Wyckoff,  Franklin Lakes, Ringwood, West Milford and terminating at the New York state  line.  S-4-C, extending from Route 4 at Bennett Station, via Broadway in West  Cape May, to Sunset boulevard, to the [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey. ROUTE NO. S-4-A, Extension. Beginning at the southerly terminus of Route S-4-A on Little Beach and from thence to the city of Brigantine. (cf: P.L.1938, c341, s.1) 16.  Section 1.2 of P.L.1961, c.13 (C.32:11D-2) is amended to read as follows: 1.2.  For the purposes of this compact, and of any supplemental or concurring legislation enacted pursuant thereto, except as may be otherwise required by the context: (a)  "Basin" shall mean the area of drainage into the Delaware river and its tributaries, including [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey; (b)  "Commission" shall mean the Delaware River Basin Commission created and constituted by this compact; (c)  "Compact" shall mean this act. (d)  "Cost" shall mean direct and indirect expenditures, commitment, and net induced adverse effects, whether or not compensated for, used or incurred in connection with the establishment, acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of a project; (e)  "Facility" shall mean any real or personal property, within or without  the basin, and improvements thereof or thereon, and any and all rights of way,  water, water rights, plants, structures, machinery and equipment, acquired,  constructed, operated or maintained for the beneficial use of water resources  or related land uses including, without limiting the generality of the  foregoing, any and all things and appurtenances necessary, useful or convenient  for the control, collection, storage, withdrawal, diversion, release,  treatment, transmission, sale or exchange of water;  or for navigation thereon,  or the development and use of hydroelectric energy and power, and public  recreational facilities;  or the propagation of fish and wildlife;  or to  conserve and protect the water resources of the basin or any existing or future  water supply source, or to facilitate any other uses of any of them; (f)  "Federal Government" shall mean the government of the United States of  America, and any appropriate branch, department, bureau or division thereof, as  the case may be; (g)  "Project" shall mean any work, service or activity which is separately  planned, financed, or identified by the commission, or any separate facility  undertaken or to be undertaken within a specified area, for the conservation, utilization, control, development or management of water resources which can be  established and utilized independently or as an addition to an existing facility, and can be considered as a separate entity for purposes of evaluation; (h)  "Signatory party" shall mean a State or Commonwealth party to this compact, and the Federal Government; (i)  "Water resources" shall include water and related natural resources in, on, under, or above the ground, including related uses of land, which are subject to beneficial use, ownership or control. (cf: P.L.1961, c.13, s.1.2) 17.  Section 1 of P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    The State of New Jersey hereby agrees with the State of Delaware, upon enactment by the State of Delaware of legislation having the same effect as this section, to the following compact: DELAWARE-NEW JERSEY COMPACT Whereas, The states of Delaware and New Jersey are separated by the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey, which create a natural obstacle to the uninterrupted passage of traffic other than by water and with normal commercial activity between the two states thereby hindering the economic growth and development of those areas in both states which border the river and bay; and Whereas, The pressures of existing trends from increasing traffic, growing population and greater industrialization indicate the need for closer cooperation between the two states in order to advance the economic development and to improve crossings, transportation, terminal and other facilities of the area; and Whereas, The financing, construction, operation and maintenance of such crossings, transportation, terminal and other facilities of commerce and the overall planning for future economic development of the area may be best accomplished for the benefit of the two states and their citizens, the region and nation, by the cordial cooperation of Delaware and New Jersey by and through a joint or common agency or authority; and Whereas, The Delaware-New Jersey Compact, enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C. s.1701) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) of the Pamphlet Laws of New Jersey, with the consent of the United States Congress in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), created the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority with the intention of advancing the economic growth and development of those areas in both states which border the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey by the financing, development, construction, operation and maintenance of crossings, transportation or terminal facilities, and other facilities of commerce, and by providing for overall planning for the future economic development of those areas; and Whereas, The economic growth and development of areas of both states will be further advanced by authorizing the authority to undertake economic development projects, other than major projects as defined in Article II, at its own initiative, and to undertake major projects after securing only such approvals as may be required by legislation of the state in which the project is to be located, except that the authority is prohibited from undertaking any major project, to be located in the Delaware River or Bay, including, without limitation, any deep-water port or superport, without the prior approval, by concurrent legislation, of the two states; and Whereas, The natural environment of those areas in the two states which border the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey would be better preserved by requiring that the projects, other than crossings, of the authority shall be in complete compliance with all applicable environmental protection laws and regulations before the authority may undertake the planning, development, construction or operation of any project, other than a crossing; NOW, THEREFORE, The State of Delaware and the State of New Jersey do hereby solemnly covenant and agree, each with the other as follows: ARTICLE I SHORT TITLE This compact shall be known as the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact." ARTICLE II DEFINITIONS "Charge card" means any card, plate, coupon book or other device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, services or anything else of value on credit which is not subject to a finance charge. "Credit card" means any card, plate, coupon book or other device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, services or anything else of value on credit which may be subject to a finance charge. "Financial records" mean all receipts and records of disbursements, revenues and expenses, operating and capital outlay expenses, assets and liabilities, including the fiscal status of authority facilities, projects and developments, including the status of reserve, depreciation, special or other funds and the receipts and payments of these funds, and schedules of authority bonds and notes. "Information" means all authority books, papers, maps, photographs, cards or other documentary materials, regardless of physical form or characteristics. "Crossing" means any structure or facility adapted for public use in crossing the Delaware River or Bay between the states, whether by bridge, tunnel, ferry or other device, and by any vehicle or means of transportation of persons or property, as well as all approaches thereto and connecting and service routes and all appurtenances and equipment relating thereto. "Transportation facility" and "terminal facility" mean any structure or facility other than a crossing as herein defined, adapted for public use within each of the states party hereto in connection with the transportation of persons or property, including railroads, motor vehicles, watercraft, airports and aircraft, docks, wharves, piers, slips, basins, storage places, sheds, warehouses, and every means or vehicle of transportation now or hereafter in use for the transportation of persons and property or the storage, handling or loading of property, as well as all appurtenances and equipment related thereto. "Commerce facility or development" means any structure or facility adapted for public use or any development for a public purpose within each of the states party hereto in connection with recreational and commercial fishery development, recreational marina development, aquaculture (marine farming), shoreline preservation and development (including wetlands and open-lands acquisition, active recreational and park development, beach restoration and development, dredge spoil disposal, and port-oriented development), foreign trade zone site development, manufacturing and industrial facilities, and any other facility or activity designed, directly or indirectly, to promote business or commerce which, in the judgment of the authority, is required for the sound economic development of the area. "Appurtenances" and "equipment" mean all works, buildings, structures, devices, appliances and supplies, as well as every kind of mechanism, arrangement, object or substance related to and necessary or convenient for the proper construction, equipment, maintenance, improvement and operation of any crossing, transportation facility or terminal facility, or commerce facility or development. "Project" means any undertaking or program for the acquisition or creation of any crossing, transportation facility or terminal facility, or commerce facility or development, or any part thereof, as well as for the operation, maintenance and improvement thereof. "Major project" means any project, other than a crossing, having or likely to have significant environmental impacts on the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey, its shorelines or estuaries, or any other area in the State of Delaware or the New Jersey counties of Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem, as determined in accordance with state law by the environmental agency of the state in which the major project is to be located. "Tunnel" means a tunnel of one or more tubes. "Governor" means any person authorized by the Constitution and law of each state to exercise the functions, powers and duties of that office. "Authority" means the authority created by this compact or any agency successor thereto. The singular whenever used in this compact shall include the plural, and the plural shall include the singular. ARTICLE III FAITHFUL COOPERATION They agree to and pledge, each to the other, faithful cooperation in the effectuation of this compact and any future amendment or supplement thereto, and of any legislation expressly in implementation thereof hereafter enacted, and in the planning, development, financing, construction, operation, maintenance and improvement of all projects entrusted to the authority created by this compact. ARTICLE IV ESTABLISHMENT OF AGENCY; PURPOSES The two states agree that there shall be created and they do hereby create a body politic, to be known as "The Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority" (for brevity hereinafter referred to as the "authority"), which shall constitute an agency of government of the State of Delaware and the State of New Jersey for the following general public purposes, and which shall be deemed to be exercising essential government functions in effectuating such purposes, to wit: (a)   The planning, financing, development, construction, purchase, lease, maintenance, improvement and operation of crossings between the states of Delaware and New Jersey across the Delaware River or the Bay of New Jersey at any location south of the boundary line between the State of Delaware and the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania as extended across the Delaware River to the New Jersey shore of said river, together with such approaches or connections thereto as in the judgment of the authority are required to make adequate and efficient connections between such crossings and any public highway, or other routes in the State of Delaware or in the State of New Jersey; and (b)   The planning, financing, development, construction, purchase, lease, maintenance, improvement and operation of any transportation or terminal facility within the State of Delaware or the New Jersey counties of Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem, which facility, in the judgment of the authority, is required for the sound economic development of the area; and (c)   The planning, financing, development, construction, purchase, lease, maintenance, improvement and operation of any commerce facility or development within the State of Delaware or the New Jersey counties of Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem, which in the judgment of the authority is required for the sound economic development of the area; and (d)   The performance of such other functions as may be hereafter entrusted to the authority by concurrent legislation expressly in implementation hereof. The authority shall not undertake any major project or part thereof without having first secured such approvals as may be required by legislation of the state in which the project is to be located. The authority shall not undertake any major project, or part thereof, to be located in the Delaware River or the Bay of New Jersey, including, without limitation, any deep-water port or superport, without having first secured approval thereof by concurrent legislation of the two states expressly in implementation thereof. The authority shall not undertake any major project or part thereof without first giving public notice and holding a public hearing, if requested, on any proposed major project, in accordance with the law of the state in which the major project is to be located.  Each state shall provide by law for the time and manner for the giving of such public notice, the requesting of a public hearing and the holding of such public hearings. (e)   The commissioners of the authority shall be responsible for appointing a Director of Economic Development or Deputy Executive Director and an appropriate number of supporting staff as deemed necessary by the authority to oversee commerce and economic development activity by the authority in  the New Jersey counties of Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem. The commissioners of the authority shall also be responsible for appointing a separate Director of Economic Development or Deputy Executive Director  and an appropriate number of supporting staff as deemed necessary by the authority to oversee commerce and economic development activity by the authority in the State of Delaware. The authority shall not permit the appointment of the Directors of Economic Development or Deputy Executive Directors and supporting staff pursuant to this subsection to increase the budget of the authority. ARTICLE V COMMISSIONERS a.     The authority shall consist of 12 commissioners, six of whom shall be residents of and qualified to vote in, and shall be appointed from, the State of Delaware, and six of whom shall be residents of and qualified to vote in, and shall be appointed from, the State of New Jersey; not more than three of the commissioners of each state shall be of the same political party; the commissioners for each state shall be appointed in the manner fixed and determined from time to time by the law of each state respectively.  Each commissioner shall hold office for a term of five years, and until his successor shall have been appointed and qualified, but the terms of the first commissioners shall be so designated that the term of at least one commissioner from each state shall expire each year. All terms shall run to the first day of July.  Any vacancy, however created, shall be filled for the unexpired term only.  Any commissioner may be suspended or removed from office as provided by law of the state from which he shall be appointed. Commissioners shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses to be paid only from revenues of the authority and may not receive any other compensation for services to the authority except such as may from time to time be authorized from such revenues by concurrent legislation. b.    The authority shall not permit any commissioner or other person acting on its behalf to use  a credit card or charge card established in the name of, or the account of which is paid for by, the authority for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, services or anything else of value, except that such credit card or charge card may be used for the purposes of the business of the authority provided that the expenses and purchases by credit card or charge card do not exceed the maximum annual amount established by joint agreement between the Governor of the State of Delaware and the Governor of the State of New Jersey for the use of such cards. c.     The authority shall not permit any commissioner or other person acting on its behalf to incur expenses and purchases, other than by credit card or charge card, in the performance of their official duties  or on behalf of the authority except that such expenses and purchases may be incurred for the purposes of the business of the authority provided that such expenses do not exceed the maximum annual amount established by joint agreement between the Governor of the State of Delaware and the Governor of the State of New Jersey for such expenses and purchases. ARTICLE VI BOARD ACTION The commissioners shall have charge of the authority's property and affairs and shall, for the purpose of doing business, constitute a board; but no action of the commissioners including, but not limited to the adoption of the annual capital plan, including specifically the economic development portion of that plan, shall be binding or effective unless taken at a meeting at which at least four commissioners from each state are present, and unless at least four commissioners from each state shall vote in favor thereof.  The vote of any one or more of the commissioners from each state shall be subject to cancellation by the Governor of such state at any time within 10 days (Saturdays, Sundays and public holidays in the particular state excepted) after receipt at the Governor's office of a certified copy of the minutes of the meeting at which such vote was taken. Each state may provide by law for the manner of delivery of such minutes, and for notification of the action thereon. ARTICLE VII GENERAL POWERS For the effectuation of its authorized purposes, the authority is hereby granted the following powers: a.     To have perpetual succession. b.    To adopt and use an official seal. c.     To elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among the commissioners.  The chairman and vice-chairman shall be elected from different states, and shall each hold office for two years.  The chairmanship and vice-chairmanship shall be alternated between the two states. d.    To adopt bylaws to govern the conduct of its affairs by the board of commissioners, and it may adopt rules and regulations and may make appropriate orders to carry out and discharge its powers, duties and functions, but no bylaw, or rule, regulation or order shall take effect until it has been filed with the Secretary of State of each state or in such other manner in each state as may be provided by the law thereof.  In the establishment of rules, regulations and orders respecting the use of any crossing, transportation or terminal facility or commerce facility or development owned or operated by the authority, including approach roads, it shall consult with appropriate officials of both states in order to insure, as far as possible, uniformity of such rules, regulations and orders with the law of both states. e.     To appoint, or employ, such other officers, agents, attorneys, engineers and employees as it may require for the performance of its duties and to fix and determine their qualifications, duties, compensation, pensions, terms of office and all other conditions and terms of employment and retention. f.     To enter into contracts and agreements with either state or with the United States, or with any public body, department, or other agency of either state or of the United States or with any individual, firm or corporation, deemed necessary or advisable for the exercise of its purposes and powers. g.    To accept from any government or governmental department, agency or other public or private body, or from any other source, grants or contributions of money or property as well as loans, advances, guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance which it may use for or in aid of any of its purposes. h.    To acquire (by gift, purchase or condemnation), own, hire, lease, use, operate and dispose of property, whether real, personal or mixed, or of any interest therein, including any rights, franchise and property for any crossing, facility or other project owned by another, and which the authority is authorized to own and operate. i.     To designate as express highways, and control public and private access thereto, all or any approaches to any crossing or other facility of the authority for the purpose of connecting the same with any highway or other route in either state. j.     To borrow money and to evidence such loans by bonds, notes or other obligations, either secured or unsecured, and either in registered or unregistered form, and to fund or refund such evidences of indebtedness, which may be executed with facsimile signatures of such persons as may be designated by the authority and by a facsimile of its corporate seal. k.    To procure and keep in force adequate insurance or otherwise provide for the adequate protection of its property, as well as to indemnify it or its officers, agents or employees against loss or liability with respect to any risk to which it or they may be exposed in carrying out any function hereunder. l.     To grant the use of, by franchise, lease or otherwise, and to make charges for the use of, any crossing, facility or other project or property owned or controlled by it. m.  To exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire any property or interest therein. n.    To determine the exact location, system and character of and all other matters in connection with any and all crossings, transportation or terminal facilities, commerce facilities or developments or other projects which it may be authorized to own, construct, establish, effectuate, operate or control. o.    To exercise all other powers not inconsistent with the Constitutions of the two states or of the United States, which may be reasonably necessary or incidental to the effectuation of its authorized purposes or to the exercise of any of the foregoing powers, except the power to levy taxes or assessments, and generally to exercise in connection with its property and affairs, and in connection with property within its control, any and all powers which might be exercised by a natural person or a private corporation in connection with similar property and affairs. ARTICLE VIII ADDITIONAL POWERS For the purpose of effectuating the authorized purposes of the authority, additional powers may be granted to the authority by legislation of either state without the concurrence of the other, and may be exercised within such state, or may be granted to the authority by Congress and exercised by it; but no additional duties or obligations shall be undertaken by the authority under the law of either state or of Congress without authorization by the law of both states. ARTICLE IX EMINENT DOMAIN If the authority shall find and determine that any property or interest therein is required for a public use in furtherance of the purposes of the authority, said determination shall not be affected by the fact that such property has theretofore been taken over or is then devoted to a public use, but the public use in the hands or under the control of the authority, shall be deemed superior to the public use for which it has theretofore been taken or to which it is then devoted.  The authority shall not exercise the power of eminent domain granted herein to acquire any property, other than a crossing, devoted to a public use, of either state, or of any municipality, local government, agency, public authority or commission, or of two or more of them, for any purpose other than a crossing, without having first secured the authorization of the holder of the title to the land in question and such other approvals as may be required by legislation of the state in which the project is to be located.  The authority shall not exercise the power of eminent domain in connection with any commerce facility or development. In any condemnation proceeding in connection with the acquisition by the authority of property or property rights of any character in either state and the right of inspection and immediate entry thereon, through the exercise by it of its power of eminent domain, any existing or future law or rule of court of the state in which such property is located with respect to the condemnation of property for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of highways therein, shall control.  The authority shall have the same power and authority with respect thereto as the state agency named in any such law; provided that nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring joint or concurrent action by the two states with respect to the enactment, repeal or amendment of any law or rule of court on the subject of condemnation under which the authority may proceed by virtue of this article. If the established grade of any street, avenue, highway or other route shall be changed by reason of the construction by the authority of any work so as to cause loss or injury to any property abutting on such street, avenue, highway or other route, the authority may enter into voluntary agreements with such abutting property owners and pay reasonable compensation for any loss or injury so sustained, whether or not it be compensable as damages under the condemnation law of the state. The power of the authority to acquire property by condemnation shall be a continuing power, and no exercise thereof shall be deemed to exhaust it. ARTICLE X REVENUES AND APPLICATION a.     The authority is hereby authorized to establish, levy and collect such tolls and other charges as it may deem necessary, proper or desirable, in connection with any crossing, transportation or terminal facility, commerce facility or development, or other project which it is or may be authorized at any time to construct, own, operate or control, and the aggregate of said tolls and charges shall be at least sufficient (1) to meet the combined expenses of operation, maintenance and improvement thereof, (2) to pay the cost of acquisition or construction, including the payment, amortization and retirement of bonds or other securities or obligations assumed, issued or incurred by the authority, together with interest thereon and (3) to provide reserves for such purposes; and the authority is hereby authorized and empowered, subject to prior pledges, if any, to pledge such tolls and other revenues or any part thereof as security for the repayment with interest of any moneys borrowed by it or advanced to it for its authorized purposes and as security for the satisfaction of any other obligations assumed by it in connection with such loans or advances.  There shall be allocated to the cost of the acquisition, construction, operation, maintenance and improvement of such facilities and projects, such proportion of the general expenses of the authority as it shall deem properly chargeable thereto. b.    No action taken by the authority to increase tolls, charges or fares on the Delaware Memorial Bridge or the Cape May-Lewes Ferry shall have force or effect without first giving public notice and holding public hearings within the New Jersey counties of Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem and all counties in the State of Delaware concerning the proposed increase in tolls, charges or fares.  The authority shall be required to provide appropriate supporting information and financial records related to the proposed increase in tolls, charges or fares to the presiding officers of the Legislature of the State of Delaware and the Legislature of the State of New Jersey at least five days in advance of the first public hearing required to be held on the proposed increase. ARTICLE XI COVENANT WITH BONDHOLDERS The two said states covenant and agree with each other and with the holders of any bonds or other securities or obligations of the authority, assumed, issued or incurred by it and as security for which there may be pledged the tolls and revenues or any part thereof of any crossing, transportation or terminal facility, commerce facility or development, or other project, that the two said states will not, so long as any of such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, diminish or impair the power of the authority to establish, levy and collect tolls and other charges in connection therewith, and that neither of the two said states will, so long as any of such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, authorize any crossing of the Delaware River or [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey south of the line mentioned in Article IV (a) of this compact, by any person or body other than the authority; unless, in either case, adequate provision shall be made by law for the protection of those advancing money upon such obligations. ARTICLE XII SECURITIES LAWFUL INVESTMENTS The bonds or other securities or obligations which may be issued by the authority pursuant to this compact, or any amendments hereof or supplements hereto, are hereby declared to be negotiable instruments, and are hereby made securities in which all state and municipal officers and bodies of each state, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all administrators, executors, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of either state, may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital, belonging to them or within their control; and said obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and shall be received by any state or municipal officer or agency of either state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of such state is now or may hereafter be authorized. ARTICLE XIII TAX STATUS The powers and functions exercised by the authority under this compact and any amendments hereof or supplements hereto are and will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the states of Delaware and New Jersey, the region and nation, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity and for the enhancement of their general welfare.  To this end, the authority shall be regarded as performing essential governmental functions in exercising such powers and functions and in carrying out the provisions of this compact and of any law relating thereto, and shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments of any character, levied by either state or political subdivision thereof, upon any of the property used by it for such purposes, or any income or revenue therefrom, including any profit from a sale or exchange. The bonds or other securities or obligations issued by the authority, their transfer and the interest paid thereon or income therefrom, including any profit from a sale or exchange, shall at all times be free from taxation by either state or any subdivision thereof. ARTICLE XIV JURISDICTION; USE OF LANDS Each of the two states hereby consents to the use and occupancy by the authority of any lands and property of the authority in such state for the construction, operation, maintenance or improvement of any crossing, transportation or terminal facility, commerce facility or development, or other project which it is or may be authorized at any time to construct, own or operate, including lands lying under water. ARTICLE XV REVIEW AND ENFORCEMENT OF RULES Judicial proceedings to review any bylaw, rule, regulation, order or other action of the authority or to determine the meaning or effect thereof, may be brought in such court of each state, and pursuant to such law or rules thereof, as a similar proceeding with respect to any agency of such state might be brought. Each state may provide by law what penalty or penalties shall be imposed for violation of any lawful rule, regulation or order of the authority, and, by law or rule of court, for the manner of enforcing the same. ARTICLE XVI NO PLEDGE OF CREDIT The authority shall have no power to pledge the credit or to create any debt or liability of the State of Delaware, of the State of New Jersey, or of any other agency or of any political subdivision of said states. ARTICLE XVII LOCAL COOPERATION AND AGREEMENTS a.     All municipalities, political subdivisions and every department, agency or public body of each of the states are hereby authorized and empowered to cooperate with, aid and assist the authority in effectuating the provisions of this compact and of any amendment hereof or supplement hereto. b.    The authority is authorized and empowered to cooperate with each of the states, or any political subdivision thereof, and with any municipality, local government, agency, public authority or commission of the foregoing, in connection with the acquisition, planning, rehabilitation, construction or development of any project, other than a crossing, and to enter into an agreement or agreements, subject to compliance with the laws of the state in which the project is to be located, with each of the states, or with any political subdivision thereof, and with any municipality, county, local government, agency, public authority or commission or with two or more of them, for or relating to such purposes. c.     The authority and the city, town, municipality or other political subdivision in which any project, other than a crossing, is to be located are hereby authorized and empowered, subject to compliance with the laws of the state in which the project is to be located, to enter into an agreement or agreements to provide which local laws, resolutions, ordinances, rules and regulations, if any, of the city, town, municipality or other political subdivision affected by such project shall apply to such project.  All other existing local laws, resolutions, ordinances or rules and regulations not provided for in the agreement shall be applicable to the project, other than a crossing.  All local laws, resolutions, ordinances or rules and regulations enacted after the date of the agreement shall not be applicable to such projects unless made applicable by the agreement or any modification thereto. ARTICLE XVIII DEPOSITARIES All banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and other persons carrying on a banking business under the laws of either state are authorized to give security for the safekeeping and prompt payment of moneys of the authority deposited by it with them, in such manner and form as may be required by and may be approved by the authority, which security may consist of a good and sufficient undertaking with such sureties as may be approved by the authority, or may consist of the deposit with the authority or other depositary approved by the authority as collateral of such securities as the authority may approve. ARTICLE XIX AGENCY POLICE Members of the police force established by the authority, regardless of their residence, shall have in each state, on the crossings, transportation or terminal facilities, commerce facilities or developments and other projects and the approaches thereto, owned, operated or controlled by the authority, and at such other places and under such circumstances as the law of each state may provide, all the powers of investigation, detention and arrest conferred by law on peace officers, sheriffs or constables in such state or usually exercised by such officers in each state. ARTICLE XX REPORTS AND AUDITS a.     The authority shall make annual reports to the Governors and Legislatures of the State of Delaware and the State of New Jersey, setting forth in detail its operations and transactions, and may make such additional reports from time to time to the Governors and Legislatures as it may deem desirable. It shall, at least annually, cause an independent audit of its fiscal affairs to be made and shall furnish a copy of such audit report together with such additional information or data with respect to its affairs as it may deem desirable to the Governors and Legislatures of each state. It shall furnish such information or data with respect to its affairs as may be requested by the Governor or Legislature of each state. b.    The authority shall, within 180 days after the end of each fiscal year of the authority, submit to the Governor and Legislature of the State of Delaware and the Governor and Legislature of the State of New Jersey a complete and detailed report of the following: (1)   its operations and accomplishments during the completed fiscal year; (2)   its receipts and disbursements or revenues and expenses during that year in accordance with the categories and classifications established by the authority for its own operating and capital outlay purposes; (3)   its assets and liabilities at the end of the fiscal year, including the status of reserve, depreciation, special or other funds including debits and credits of these funds; (4)   a schedule of bonds and notes outstanding at the end of the fiscal year; (5)   a list of all contracts exceeding $100,000 entered into during the fiscal year; (6)   a business or strategic plan for the authority and for each of its operating divisions; (7)   a capital plan containing specific goals and objectives including, but not limited to, economic development goals and objectives in the State of Delaware and in the New Jersey counties of Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem; and (8)   the authority's progress toward meeting the prior year's economic development goals and objectives. ARTICLE XXI BOUNDARIES UNAFFECTED The existing territorial or boundary lines of the states, or the jurisdiction of the two states established by said boundary lines, shall not be changed hereby. ARTICLE XXII ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION a.     The planning, development, construction and operation of any project, other than a crossing, shall comply with all environmental protection laws, regulations, directives and orders, including, without limitation, any coastal zone laws, wetlands laws, or subaqueous land laws or natural resource laws, now or hereafter enacted, or promulgated by the state in which the project, or any part thereof, is located. b.    The planning, development, construction and operation of any project, other than a crossing, to be located in the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey shall comply with all environmental protection laws, regulations, directives and orders, including, without limitation, any coastal zone laws, wetlands laws, subaqueous land laws or natural resource laws, now or hereafter enacted or promulgated by either state. c.     The planning, development, construction and operation of any project, other than a crossing, located in the coastal zone of Delaware (as defined in Chapter 70 of Title 7 of the Delaware Code, as in effect on January 1, 1989), shall be subject to the same limitations, requirements, procedures and appeals as apply to any other person under the Delaware Coastal Zone Act, Chapter 70 of Title 7 of the Delaware Code, as in effect on January 1, 1989.  Nothing in this compact shall be deemed to preempt, modify or supersede any provision of the Delaware Coastal Zone Act, Chapter 70 of Title 7 of the Delaware Code, as in effect on January 1, 1989.  The interpretation and application of this paragraph shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware and be determined by the courts of the State of Delaware. d.    The planning, development, construction and operation of any project, other than a crossing, located in New Jersey, shall be subject to the provisions of New Jersey law, when applicable, including, but not limited to, "The Wetlands Act of 1970," P.L.1970, c.272 (C.13:9A-1 et seq.) and the "Coastal Area Facility Review Act," P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2003, c.192, s.1) 18.  Section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1) is amended to read as follows: The Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority shall not approve any project, other than a crossing, or part thereof without first holding a public hearing on the proposed project.  The authority shall cause to be published notice of the public hearing at least 10 days prior to the hearing in at least three newspapers with a daily circulation in Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem counties.  The Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority shall not undertake any project, other than a crossing, to be located in the State of New Jersey or in the Delaware River or the Bay of New Jersey, without having first secured legislative authorization and approval of each specific project or part thereof pursuant to New Jersey law. (cf: P.L.1989, c.191, s.1) 19.  Section 3 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.3) is amended to read as follows: The Governor is hereby authorized to apply on behalf of the State of New Jersey to the Congress of the United States for its consent and approval to any modifications to the compact and to the use of tolls collected on any crossing for the financing of any transportation or terminal facility or commerce facility or development constructed or operated by the authority, but in the absence of such consent and approval, the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority shall have all the powers the State of Delaware and the State of New Jersey may confer upon it without the consent and approval of Congress. (cf: P.L.1989, c.191, s.3) 20.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.362 (C.32:11E-1.4) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For the purposes of complying with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1) the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority created pursuant to the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C.1701 et seq.) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) with the consent of the Congress of the United States in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), is authorized, pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), to undertake a project to lease the property and manage the operations of the Cape May County Airport/Industrial Park, located in the Township of Lower, Cape May County, from the County of Cape May, which shall be considered a project of the authority as defined pursuant to Article II of the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," P.L.1961, c.66, as amended by to P.L.1989, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.), which project shall continue to maintain airport operations, as well as an industrial park, in that location. (cf: P.L.1995, c.362, s.1) 21.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.379 (C.32:11E-1.5) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For the purposes of complying with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1) the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority created pursuant to the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C.1701 et seq.) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) with the consent of the Congress of the United States in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), is authorized, pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), to undertake a project to lease the property and manage the operations of the Cape May County Airport/Industrial Park, located in the Township of Lower, Cape May County, from the County of Cape May, which shall be considered a project of the authority as defined pursuant to Article II of the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," P.L.1961, c.66, as amended by to P.L.1989, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.), which project shall continue to maintain airport operations, as well as an industrial park, in that location. (cf: P.L.1995, c.379, s.1) 22.  Section 1 of P.L.1996, c.141 (C.32:11E-1.6) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, a full-time, permanently appointed police officer of the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority shall have full power of arrest for any crime committed in the officer's presence and committed anywhere within the territorial limits of the State of New Jersey. b.  Whenever a police officer of the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority has been conferred with Statewide police powers and is acting under lawful authority beyond the jurisdictional limits of the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority, the police officer shall have all of the immunities from tort liability and shall have all of the pension, relief, disability, workmen's compensation, insurance and other benefits enjoyed as a Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority officer  while performing duties within the jurisdiction of the Delaware River and Bay Authority. (cf: P.L.1996, c.141, s.1) 23.  Section 1 of P.L.1997, c.358 (C.32:11E-1.7) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For the purposes of complying with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1) the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority created pursuant to the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C.1701 et seq.) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) with the consent of the Congress of the United States in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), is authorized, pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), and pursuant to an agreement entered into between the City of Millville, Cumberland County, and the authority, to undertake a project to lease the property and manage the operations of the Millville Airport Utility, located in the City of Millville, Cumberland County, from the City of Millville, which shall be considered a project of the authority as defined pursuant to Article II of the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," P.L.1961, c.66, as amended by P.L.1989, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.), which project shall continue to maintain airport operations in that location. (cf: P.L.1997, c.358, s.1) 24.  Section 1 of P.L.1998, c.29 (C.32:11E-1.8) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For the purposes of complying with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority created pursuant to the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C.s.1701 et seq.) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) with the consent of the Congress of the United States in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), is authorized, pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), to undertake a project for the acquisition and creation of a corporate/business/industrial park located in Salem County, including the planning, development, financing, construction, operation, maintenance and improvement thereof, which shall be considered a project of the authority as defined pursuant to Article II of the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," P.L.1961, c.66, as amended by P.L.1989, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.1998, c.29, s.1) 25.  Section 1 of P.L.2003, c.62 (C.32:11E-1.9) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For the purposes of complying with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority created pursuant to the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C.s.1701 et seq.) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) with the consent of the Congress of the United States in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), is authorized, pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), to undertake a project for the development of a Renewable Energy and Agribusiness Park in Gloucester County or Salem County, including the acquisition of a site for the project and the planning, development, financing, construction, operation, maintenance, and improvement thereof, and the authority to lease the same, which shall be considered a project of the authority as defined pursuant to Article II of the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," P.L.1961, c.66, as amended by P.L.1989, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) and P.L.2001, c.414 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.). Not less than the prevailing wage rate shall be paid to workers employed in the performance of any construction contract undertaken in connection with a project authorized pursuant to this section.  The prevailing wage rate shall be the rate determined by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to the provisions of the "New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act," P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2003, c.62, s.1) 26.  Section 1 of P.L.2004, c.135 (C.32:11E-1.11) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For the purposes of complying with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority created pursuant to the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," enacted pursuant to 53 Laws of Delaware, Chapter 145 (17 Del. C. s. 1701 et seq.) and P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) with the consent of the Congress of the United States in accordance with Pub.L.87-678 (1962), is authorized, pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.191 (C.32:11E-1.1), to undertake a project in Gloucester County for the development of a building within the South Jersey Technology Park at Rowan University, including the leasing of a site for the project and the planning, development, financing, construction, operation, maintenance, improvement and purchase thereof, and the authority to lease and to sell the same, which shall be considered a project of the authority as defined pursuant to Article II of the "Delaware-New Jersey Compact," P.L.1961, c.66, as amended by P.L.1989, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.414 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) and P.L.2003, c.192 (C.32:11E-1 et seq.) Not less than the prevailing wage rate shall be paid to workers employed in the performance of any construction contract undertaken in connection with a project authorized pursuant to this section.  The prevailing wage rate shall be the rate determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to the provisions of the "New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act," P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2004, c.135, s.1) 27.  Section 6 of P.L.1961, c.66 (C.32:11E-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.    As soon as possible after the taking of any action by the commissioners of the authority, they shall cause the minutes thereof to be prepared in writing and shall cause 3 copies thereof, duly certified as true copies by the secretary, to be delivered to the Governor, either by handing the same personally to him or to some person in charge of his offices, or by mailing the same to him at his offices by certified mail, return receipt requested. They shall also cause 1 copy thereof to be similarly delivered to the Secretary of State.  In the event that the Governor shall act to cancel the vote of any 1 or more of the commissioners for the State of New Jersey, he shall sign a statement of cancellation, identifying the vote so canceled by reference to the minutes where said vote appears, on or before the termination of the time provided for such action by Article VI of said compact, and the said vote shall  thereupon be deemed to be canceled.  At any time prior to the expiration of the  time provided by said compact for such cancellation, the Governor may sign a statement of approval of any such vote, in which case the vote so approved  shall not thereafter be canceled.  Upon the signing of a statement of cancellation or approval, the Governor shall cause a true copy thereof to be delivered to the secretary of the authority by having the same handed to him personally or by mailing the same to him by certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall also cause a true copy thereof to be affixed to the copies of said minutes in his possession and to the copy in the possession of the  Secretary of State. Except as provided in the act, no action taken at any meeting of The Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Authority by any commissioner appointed from the State of New Jersey shall have any force or effect until the expiration of the period herein provided without cancellation by the Governor, or until his approval, whichever first occurs. (cf: P.L.1961, c.66, s.6) 28.  Section 8 of P.L.1997, c.97 (C.34:1B-142) is amended to read as follows: 8.  a.  To be eligible to receive monies from the "1996 Economic Development Site Fund," established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1996, c.70, an economic development site project must meet at least two of the following criteria: (1)  The project will support or enhance the existing economic base of the region in which it is located, which may include, but need not be limited to, the agricultural, tourism and commercial sectors, or improvements to the region's infrastructure; (2)  The project will result in the rehabilitation or expansion of existing facilities in the region in which it is located; (3)  The project will result in the creation or retention of jobs in the region in which it is located; and (4)  The project will foster the development of business or commercial ventures which will promote long-term economic growth in the region in which it is located. b.  No monies from the "1996 Economic Development Site Fund," established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1996, c.70, shall be expended for an economic development site outside of the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Region. c. For the purposes of sections 6, 7 and 8 of P.L.1997, c.97 (C.34:1B-140, C.34:1B-141 and C.34:1B-142):   "Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Region" means all the State territory located within the "port district," as defined pursuant to section 1(6) of P.L.1951, c.288 (C.32:3-13.23); and "economic development site" means land, equipment, buildings, appurtenant infrastructure and miscellaneous site improvements designed to promote economic activity and new jobs in the Delaware River and the Bay of New Jersey Region. (cf: P.L.1997, c.97, s.8) 29.  Section 1 of P.L.1996, J.R.1 (C.36:2-37) is amended to read as follows: 1.  The second Saturday in June of each year shall be designated as "[Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Day" in New Jersey for the purposes of recognizing and celebrating the importance and beauty of the [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey ecosystem. (cf: P.L.1996, J.R.1, s.1) 30.  Section 2 of P.L.1996, J.R.1 (C.36:2-38) is amended to read as follows: 2.  The people of the State and all appropriate State and local governmental entities are urged to observe "[Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Day" by participating in activities that recognize and celebrate the importance and beauty of the [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey ecosystem. (cf: P.L.1996, J.R.1, s.2) 31.  R.S.50:1-18 is amended to read as follows: 50:1-18. a. The Shellfisheries Council shall be composed of 10 members, each of whom shall be a resident of the counties of Atlantic, Burlington, Cape May, Cumberland, Monmouth, Ocean, or Salem. Each member shall be a licensed and practicing shellfisherman and shall be chosen with due regard to the person's knowledge of and interest in the culture or harvesting of shellfish, the shellfish industry and the conservation and management of shellfish. Each member of the council shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, for a term of four years and shall serve until a successor has been appointed and has qualified. Any vacancies in the membership of the council occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, for the unexpired term only.  Any member of the council may be removed from office by the Governor, for cause, upon notice and opportunity to be heard. The members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. b.    The council shall, subject to the approval of the commissioner, formulate comprehensive policies for the preservation and improvement of the shellfish industry and resource of the State.  The council shall also:  (1) consult with and advise the commissioner and the Marine Fisheries Council with respect to the implementation of the shellfisheries program; (2) study the activities of the shellfisheries program and hold hearings with respect thereto as it may deem necessary or desirable; and (3) initiate, by resolution of the council, proposed rules and regulations concerning shellfish to the commissioner. c.     No lease of any of the lands of the State under the tidal waters thereof, to be exclusively used and enjoyed by the lessee for the planting and cultivating of shellfish, shall hereafter be allowed except when approved by a majority of the appropriate section of the council; and no such lease shall hereafter in any case be allowed except when approved and signed by the commissioner. d.    The council shall be divided into two sections, one to be known as the "[Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section" and the other to be known as the "Atlantic Coast Section."  The [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section shall consist of five members from the counties of Cape May, Cumberland, and Salem, with three members residing in Cumberland County and the remaining two members residing in the counties of Cape May or Salem.  The Atlantic Coast Section shall consist of five members from the counties of Atlantic, Burlington, Cape May, Ocean, and Monmouth. Except as provided in subsection e. of this section, the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section shall, subject to the approval of the commissioner, exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the council in matters relating to the shellfish industry in the tidal waters of the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey and their tributaries. The Atlantic Coast Section shall, subject to the approval of the commissioner, exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the council in matters relating to the shellfish industry in all of the tidal waters of the State except in the tidal waters of the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey and their tributaries. Each section of the council shall annually elect a chairman and a vice-chairman of the council.  If the chairman is absent, then the vice-chairman shall exercise the powers and perform the duties of the chairman. e.     The commissioner, in consultation with the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council, shall fix fees for all oysters harvested from the natural seed beds, Areas 1, 2 and 3 and those areas defined in R.S.50:3-14 within the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey and their tributaries.  These fees shall be collected by and allocated to the Division of Fish and Wildlife and shall be deposited in the "Oyster Resource Development Account," established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1996, c.112 (C.23:3-12.2). (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.8) 32.  R.S.50:1-22 is amended to read as follows: 50:1-22.  The commissioner shall establish and maintain several offices located at places convenient to persons engaged in the shellfish industry.  The records of all leases and licenses issued shall be kept therein.  One office shall be located in the area served by the Atlantic Coast Section and one office shall be located in the area served by the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.9) 33.  R.S.50:1-23 is amended to read as follows: 50:1-23.  The Shellfisheries Council may lease to applicants therefor any of the lands of the State under the tidal waters thereof, to be exclusively used and enjoyed by each such lessee for the planting and cultivating of shellfish; except that no lands shall be leased above the southwest line in the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, as defined in R.S.50:3-11, except in Section E, described in subsection a. of this section.  Nor shall any lands be leased in any creek tributary to [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, nor any lands under the waters of [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey in the sections known as Areas, 1, 2 and 3, described in subsection b. of this section.  However, Area 1 described in section 3 of P.L.1966, c.52 (C.50:3-16.3) may be leased and regulated for aquaculture practices under the authority of the "New Jersey Aquaculture Development Act," P.L.1997, c.236 (C.4:27-1 et al.).  In addition, the department, in consultation with the council, may establish aquaculture development zones for approved aquaculture practices in specific creeks or tributaries of the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey. On the Atlantic coast, no additional lands shall be leased at the mouth of the Tuckahoe River and the Great Egg Harbor River, nor the graveling beds at the mouth of the Mullica River, Parker's beds in Parker's Cove, Forked River beds, Cedar Creek beds and Sloop Creek beds in Barnegat Bay, nor any lands under the waters of the Mullica River above a line extending in a westerly direction from the south end of Deep Point; provided, however, that leases may be granted for lands heretofore leased in that area in the Mullica River, and except that no lands which lie under the waters of the Navesink River or the Shrewsbury River, shall be leased for the planting and cultivating of shellfish. The council may grant, subject to the approval of the commissioner, leases of new ground to educational institutions for the purpose of research, education, or both.  The department may adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations governing those leases, including, but not limited to, criteria for acquisition, utilization, and renewal. a.     For the purposes of this section, Section E in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey shall consist of all of the area within the boundaries described herein: Beginning at a point (X=80,906.06) (Y=44,868.54) said point being Channel Marker QR "32" and corner #1 of said section and running thence N 62° 00' 30.69" E 2,015.32 meters to corner #2 (X=82,685.62) (Y=45,814.42); thence S 56° 26' 20.6587" E 10,180.43 meters to corner #3 being also corner #1 lot 530 section D leased oyster ground lot (X=91,168.96) (Y=40,186.43) located on or near the southwest line; thence along the southwest line S 55° 22' 47.4875" W 5,858.91 meters to Cross Ledge Shoal Old Lighthouse foundation being corner #4 of the section (X=86,347.45) (Y=36,857.80); thence N 15° 55' 56.8215" W 5,407.14 meters to corner #5 being also GR "WR" buoy marking a wreck in the bay (X=84,863.17) (Y=42,057.23); thence N 42° 36' 15.5936" W 1,078.45 meters to a point in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey being corner #6 of section E (X=84,133.13) (Y=42,851.02); thence S 70° 23' 47.4333" W 2,169.15 meters to corner #7 being a point on the east side of the Main Ship Channel in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey (X=82,089.71) (Y=42,123.25); thence N 23° 19' 25.1298" W 2,989.59 meters to corner #1 the place of beginning. b.    Areas 1, 2, and 3 in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey shall consist of all area within the boundaries described herein: Southwesterly of a line beginning at a point (X=114225.30) (Y=26636.70) on the shore of [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey in Cape May County, said point being about 200 meters south-southwest of Rutgers Cape Shore Laboratory, and running thence N 67° 31' 48.1592" W 6439.36 meters to a corner (X=108274.82) (Y=29097.81) said corner being on the line running from Dennis Creek Rear Range Light to Brandywine Lighthouse. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.10) 34.  Section 1 of P.L.1950, c.310 (C.50:2-6.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    No person shall take, harvest or dredge for surf clams (Spisula solidissima) from any waters of this State without first obtaining a surf clam license from the commissioner, except that the holder of a recreational shellfish license may harvest up to 150 surf clams per day from waters classified as "Approved," as defined in rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), with hand implements only.  The commissioner may issue licenses for the harvesting of surf clams within the waters of this State.  The license shall be issued on a seasonal basis pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner. Such licenses shall grant the privilege of gathering surf clams by dredging, but only in the Atlantic Ocean, but not in the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey north and west of the COLREGS demarcation line which runs from Cape May Point Lighthouse in Cape May, New Jersey to Harbor of Refuge Lighthouse at Cape Henlopen, Delaware or in the Sandy Hook Bay west of a line from the west point of Sandy Hook to Roamer Shoal Lighthouse.  No boat or vessel shall be licensed under P.L.1950, c.310 (C.50:2-6.1 et seq.) unless its bona fide owner is an individual or entity legally domiciled or incorporated in this State. The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations regarding the issuance procedures of such licenses. The commissioner may issue permits for surf clam research, inventory and educational projects.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the activities of those projects. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.30) 35.  R.S.50:2-7 is amended to read as follows: 50:2-7.  All oysters, oyster shells and other material dredged, tonged or in any manner raised or taken from any of the beds and grounds above what is known as the southwest line in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, except in that area known as Section "E" as defined in R.S.50:1-23, or from any natural oyster bed or ground, shell bed or reef, where oysters naturally spawn and grow under the tidal waters of the State, shall be culled as soon as they are emptied out of the tongs or dredges on the culling board, conveyor, culling device, or deck of the boat or vessel employed for the purpose, and before they are shoveled back from the culling board or portion of the deck used for emptying the tongs or dredges. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.33) 36.  R.S.50:2-10.1 is amended to read as follows: 50:2-10.1.  No person shall use or employ any boat or other vessel propelled wholly or in part by steam, naphtha, gasoline, electricity or any other mechanical motive power, or any motor driven apparatus, for the purpose of catching or taking of clams from any of the waters of this State, whereby the soil or bottom on or in which the clams are found is agitated or disturbed by the propeller wheel or wheels of the boat or vessel or by any other motor or mechanically driven apparatus thereon for the purpose of catching or taking clams as aforesaid, except by permit issued by the department with the approval of the council for taking clams from the waters of the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.38) 37.  R.S.50:3-1 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-1.  No boat or vessel shall be used or employed in the catching or taking of oysters in the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey or their tributaries in this State, without a license for that purpose issued by the commissioner. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.42) 38.  R.S.50:3-2 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-2. The [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council may fix the license fee at any sum, except that the fee shall be not less than $10, or less than $2 per gross ton of the boat or vessel, whichever is greater, for boats or vessels required to be licensed under R.S.50:3-1. No license shall be issued for a period longer than one year. All licenses shall be numbered and recorded by the commissioner. All fees for licenses collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the "Oyster Resource Development Account," established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1996, c.112 (C.23:3-12.2), and shall be subject to all the terms and conditions of that section. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.43) 39.  R.S.50:3-6 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-6.  No boat or vessel shall be operated in the catching or taking of shellfish from any of the natural beds under the tidal waters of the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey and their tributaries, in this State, while equipped with more than two dredges at any one time.  No dredging shall be permitted within the beds, creeks and rivers, described in R.S.50:3-14, with the exception of the Cohansey River and the lands under the waters of [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey in the section known as Areas 1, 2 and 3, described in R.S.50:1-23. Shellfish may be caught and taken from the Cohansey River and Areas 1, 2, and 3 by means of such boats and dredges beginning at 6:00 Ante Meridian Standard Time, quitting at 2:30 Post Meridian Standard Time Monday through Friday during the months of May and June, subject to the power of the Shellfisheries Council, by rule or regulation, to prohibit the taking or catching of shellfish in such manner from any of those beds and for such time as, in the judgment of the council, may be necessary in order to close the beds for purposes of conservation. (cf: P.L. 2007, c.338, s.46) 40.  R.S.50:3-7 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-7.  No person shall use any dredge for the purpose of catching or taking shellfish from any of the natural beds or grounds in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey or Delaware River above the line running direct from the mouth of Straight Creek to Cross Ledge Shoal Old Lighthouse, commonly known and hereinafter referred to as the "southwest line," except in that area known as Section "E" as defined in R.S.50:1-23, the tooth bar of which dredge measures more than 54 inches across from center of bolt hole to center of bolt hole where the frame thereof is fastened to the tooth bar, or any dredge which measures more than 5 feet 2 inches in width from the extreme outside to outside of frame, or any dredge which measures more than 21 inches from center of tooth bar to center of cross bar, or any dredge the bag of which contains more than 17 rows of 2 inch rings, or any dredge the rings of which are less than 2 inches in diameter, inside measurement, or any dredge the bag of which measures more than 5 feet around the bag from center of tooth bar to center of cross bar, or any dredge which weighs more than 250 pounds. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.47) 41.  R.S.50:3-8 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-8.  Except in that area known as Section "E" as defined in R.S.50:1-23, no person shall catch, take, or attempt to catch or take oysters from any of the lands lying under the tidal waters of the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey or their tributaries, above the southwest line, except at the times and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner after consultation with the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.48) 42.  R.S.50:3-9 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-9.  No person shall possess, sell or offer for sale any oysters caught or taken from any natural oyster bed or ground where oysters naturally spawn and grow under the tidal waters of the Delaware River, [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey or Maurice River Cove above the southwest line, except from and including April first to and including June thirtieth of each year or as otherwise determined by the commissioner after consultation with the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.49) 43.  R.S.50:3-10 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-10.  Nothing in this Title shall strengthen, confirm or verify the title of any person to any lands lying under the tidal waters of the Delaware River or [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, above the southwest line. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.50) 44.  R.S.50:3-11 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-11.  No oysters shall be dredged for, caught or taken from that area known as Section "E" as defined in R.S.50:1-23 or from any of the lands lying under the tidal waters of the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey and Maurice River Cove below a line running direct from the mouth of Straight Creek to Cross Ledge Shoal Old Lighthouse, commonly known and hereinafter referred to as the "southwest line," at any time except from September 1 to June 30 then next, both inclusive, of each year; unless authorized by the commissioner after consultation with the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey Section of the Shellfisheries Council. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.51) 45.  R.S.50:3-13 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-13.  No person shall dredge upon or throw, cast or drag an oyster or clam dredge, or any other instrument or appliance used for catching shellfish, in that area known as Section "E" as defined in R.S.50:1-23 or upon any of the land of the State lying under the tidal waters of the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, in this State, below the southwest line, other than land or ground for which the person then holds a lease from the Shellfisheries Council under this Title.  A lessee may, however, authorize another individual to dredge for shellfish on the lease using authorized gear during the authorized season.  Any such authorization shall be in writing, signed by all parties on forms provided by the Division of Fish and Wildlife, and shall be in the dredger's possession at all times during dredging operations. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.53) 46.  R.S.50:3-14 is amended to read as follows: 50:3-14. a. No person shall use or cause to be used any dredge, drag, scrape or other instrument, except hand tongs, for the purpose of catching shellfish from the following named beds, creeks, and rivers of this State, along the shore of [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, the areas of which are described by coordinates and bearings taken from the official survey base known as the "New Jersey system of plane coordinates" as defined in article 2 of chapter 3 of Title 51 of the Revised Statutes, viz.: (1)   Elder point beds, Andrews ditch beds, East point beds, described as follows: Beginning at a point with coordinates (X=104,451.54) (Y=40,377.57) said point being now or formerly East Point Lighthouse and running thence N 48° 16' 48.910" W 2865.15 meters to a point (X=102,312.9) (Y=42,284.30) on or near the east bank of the mouth of New England Creek; thence following in an easterly direction the shore line and crossing the mouth of the Maurice River and following the shore line to the point of beginning; (2)   High beds and Pepper beds, described as follows: Beginning at a point with coordinates (X=104,451.5) (Y=40,377.57) said point being now or formerly East Point Lighthouse and running thence S 55° 06' 44.5440" W 2022.82 meters to a corner (X=102,792.2) (Y=39,220.58) in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey the same being corner number 2 of oyster ground number 48 section C now or formerly leased by Robbins and Robbins Inc.; thence N 76° 47' 57.9276" W 324.19 meters to a corner (X=102,476.6) (Y=39,294.61) the same being corner No. 3 of oyster ground No. 22 section C now or formerly leased by Robbins and Robbins Inc.; thence N 03° 08' 00.7977" W 2994.17 meters to a point (X=102,312.9) (Y=42,284.30) on the east bank of the mouth of New England Creek; thence S 48`-23 ' -07 " E 2,865 meters to the point of beginning; (3)   Dividing Creek beds and Oranoken beds, described as follows:  Beginning at a point with coordinates (X=99,599.58) (Y=41,933.40) said point being located on the meadow land at Kenny's Point about 1,829 meters east south east of the mouth of Dividing Creek and running thence S 39° 32' 52.0432" W 2,276.59 meters to a corner in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey (X=98,158.25) (Y=40,237.93); thence N 69° 00' 23.9963" W 2179.71 meters to a corner (X=96,123.23)(Y=41,018.83) on the meadow land said corner being about 880 meters south west of the mouth of Oranoken Creek; thence following the shore line in a north east and east south east direction, crossing the mouths of Oranoken Creek and Dividing Creek to the point of beginning; (4)   Nantuxent Creek beds, Beach Creek beds, Goshen Creek, Dennis Creek, East Creek, West Creek, West Creek beds at the mouth of West Creek, Dividing Creek and its tributaries, Oranoken Creek and its tributaries, Little Brothers and Big Brothers Creeks, Straight Creek, Fishing Creek in Cumberland County, Oyster Creek, Fortescue Creek, Beadons Creek, Sow and Pigs Creek, Dare's Creek, Padgett's Creek, Nantuxent Creek, Cedar Creek, Back Creek, Middle Marsh Creek, Stow Creek, Bidwell Creek, Nantuxent beds at the mouth of Nantuxent Creek, Back Creek beds at the mouth of Back Creek, the Nantuxent beds and Back Creek beds taking in that area north of a line running direct from Nantuxent Point to Ben Davis Point, Cohansey beds at the mouth of Cohansey River, said beds taking in that area north of a line extending from the south bank of the mouth of Middle Marsh Creek direct to Cohansey Point, and Maurice River and Cohansey River; except that during May and June in any year oysters may be taken from the beds in the Cohansey River and Stow Creek by means of dredges. b.    No licenses shall be issued by the Division of Fish and Wildlife contrary to this section.  The department, in consultation with the council, may permit the use of hand scrapes or mechanically-retrieved oyster scrapes in certain beds, creeks and tributaries to harvest specific quantities of oysters, provided such use will not be detrimental to the resource in those areas. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.54) 47.  Section 1 of P.L.1966, c.52 (C.50:3-16.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    The area southwest of the Clam Line and southeast of the Brandywine-Dennis Creek Line more fully described by coordinates and bearings taken from the official survey base known as the "New Jersey system of plane coordinates" as defined in article 2 of chapter 3 of Title 51 of the Revised Statutes, viz.: Beginning at a point in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey (X=108,274.8)(Y=29,097.81) said point being the intersection of the Clam Line with the Brandywine-Dennis Creek Line; and running thence S 67° 31' 48.16" E 21,126.46 meters to a point where the Clam Line intersects the shore line of Cape May County (X=114,225.3)(Y=26,636.70) said point being about 200 meters south southwest of Rutgers Cape Shore Laboratory; thence following the high water mark along the shore line of Cape May County in a southerly direction its various courses and distances to a point (X=109,127.0)(Y=11,597.75) located on the Cape May Point Lighthouse-Brandywine Shoal Lighthouse Line; thence along this line N 65° 36' 53.5" W 44,128.37 meters to Brandywine Shoal Lighthouse (X=96,876.60)(Y=17,150.99), thence along the Brandywine-Dennis Creek Line N 43° 39' 13.6495" E 16,511.99247 meters to the place of beginning, shall be divided into three areas, to be known as follows: Area No. 1--Tongers Area. Area No. 2--Natural Seed Bed Area. Area No. 3--Shellfish Dredging Area. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.57) 48.  Section 13 of P.L.1966, c.52 (C.50:3-16.13) is amended to read as follows: 13.  It shall be lawful to catch and take shellfish in that portion of the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, hereinbefore described as Areas Nos. 2 and 3, upon compliance with the provisions of this Title and any rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.67) 49.  Section 3 of P.L.1966, c.52 (C.50:3-16.3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Area No. 1--Tongers Area is described as follows:  Beginning at a point (X=111,656.5)(Y=27,699.12) said point located on the Clam Line 1 1/2 nautical miles off shore; and running thence S 67° 31' 50.66" E 9,119.92 meters to a point where the Clam Line intersects the shore line of Cape May County (X=114,225.3)(Y=26,636.70) said point also being about 200 meters south south west of Rutgers Cape Shore Laboratory; thence following the high water mark along the shore line of Cape May County in a southerly direction its various courses and distances to a point (X=109,127.0)(Y=11,597.75) located on the Cape May Point Lighthouse-Brandywine Shoal Lighthouse Line; thence along this line N 65° 36' 53.99" W 10,919.86 meters to a point (X=106,095.5)(Y=12,971.93) located on the Cape May Point Lighthouse-Brandywine Shoal Lighthouse Line; thence N 05° 29' 54.29" E 32,024.59 meters to a point (X=107,030.8)(Y=22,688.13) in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey; thence S 60° 45' 15.72" E 5,698.81 meters to a point (X=108,546.4)(Y=21,839.51) in [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey; thence N 27° 57' 28.84" E 21,764.48 meters to the place of beginning. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.57) 50.  Section 1 of P.L.1945, c.39 (C.50:3-20.10) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in P.L.1945, c.39 (C.50:3-20.10 et seq.): "Oyster dealer" means any person who, for himself or as an agent or broker, purchases from oyster planters, within this State, oysters so originating, in the shells, for purpose of resale or shipment for resale or for use other than the use of himself and his family, in the shells, and, also, any person who plants and grows oysters so originating and packs and ships or otherwise sells oysters so originating, in the shells, to persons not required to be licensed under P.L.1945, c.39 (C.50:3-20.10 et seq.). "Oyster planter" means any person who plants and grows oysters so originating and who sells oysters so planted and grown, in the shells, to persons required to be licensed under P.L.1945, c.39 (C.50:3-20.10 et seq.). "Oyster shucking house" means a plant for the opening, shucking, processing and packing of oysters which originate on the natural oyster beds in the tidal waters of the Delaware River, the [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey or the Maurice River Cove or any of their tributaries. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.77) 51.  R.S.50:4-2 is amended to read as follows: 50:4-2.  No person shall use or cause to be used any dredge with bag or pocket, drag or scrape upon any of the natural oyster or clam beds under the tidal waters of the Atlantic seaboard of this State and tributaries thereof, except [Delaware] Bay of New Jersey, and no license shall be issued by the commissioner contrary to this section; but this section shall not prohibit the use of any fork, hoe or drag used by hand in the taking of soft clams; nor shall it prohibit the harvest of oysters with oyster dredges on designated leases used for oyster culture within the Mullica River-Great Bay estuary; nor shall it prohibit the taking of crabs with dredges; nor shall it preclude the department from adopting, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations governing the harvest of specific shellfish from specific areas by specific means, including, but not limited to, drags and scrapes. (cf: P.L. 2007, c.338, s.84) 52.  R.S.52:28-34 is amended to read as follows: Whereas, by joint resolution of the legislature of the state of New Jersey, approved February fourteenth, one thousand nine hundred and five, Edward C. Stokes, governor; Robert H. McCarter, attorney general; Franklin Murphy and Chauncey G. Parker were appointed and constituted commissioners of the state of New Jersey to confer with like commissioners representing the state of Delaware for the purpose of framing a compact or agreement between the said states and legislation consequent thereon, to be submitted to the legislatures of the said  two states for action thereon looking to the amicable termination of the suit between said two states now pending in the supreme court of the United States, and the final adjustment of all controversies relating to the boundary line between said states and to their respective rights in the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey;  and Whereas, by like joint resolution of the general assembly of the state of Delaware, approved February thirteenth, one thousand nine hundred and five, Preston Lea, governor; Robert H. Richards, attorney general; Herbert H. Ward and George H. Bates were appointed to represent the said state as commissioners  to confer with the commissioners of the state of New Jersey for the purpose  before recited;  and Whereas, the commissioners of the said two states, having duly conferred as  directed by said resolutions, have framed and submitted to this legislature a  proposed compact or agreement between the said states; and Whereas, the compact or agreement so framed and submitted is in the words following, that is to say: Compact between the state of New Jersey and the state of Delaware relating to the boundary controversy between said states. Whereas, a controversy hath heretofore existed between the states of New Jersey and Delaware relative to the jurisdiction of such portion of the Delaware river as is included within the circle of twelve miles radius, an arc of which constitutes the northern boundary of the state of Delaware, and it is the mutual desire of said states to so settle and determine such controversy as to prevent future complications arising therefrom; and Whereas, there is now pending in the supreme court of the United States a cause wherein the said state of New Jersey is the complainant and the said state of Delaware is the defendant, in which cause an injunction has been issued against the state of Delaware restraining the execution of certain statutes of the state of Delaware relating to fisheries in said river, which said litigation hath been pending for twenty-seven years and upwards; and Whereas, for the purpose of adjusting the differences between the said two states arising out of said conflict of jurisdiction, Edward C. Stokes, Robert H. McCarter, Franklin Murphy and Chauncey G. Parker have been appointed commissioners on the part of the state of New Jersey by joint resolution of the  legislature of said state, and Preston Lea, Robert H. Richards, Herbert H. Ward  and George H. Bates have been appointed commissioners on the part of the state  of Delaware, by joint resolution of the general assembly of said state, to  frame a compact or agreement between the said states and legislation consequent  thereon, to be submitted to the legislatures of said two states for action  thereon, looking to the amicable termination of the said suit between said  states now pending in the supreme court of the United States and the final  adjustment of all controversies relating to the boundary line between said  states, and to their respective rights in the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey; Now, therefore, the said state of New Jersey by its commissioners above named and the said state of Delaware, by its commissioners above named, do hereby make and enter into a compact or agreement between said states as follows: (cf: P.L.1905, c.42, Preamble) 53.  R.S.52:28-38 is amended to read as follows: Article IV.  Immediately upon the execution hereof the legislature of the state of New Jersey shall appoint three commissioners to confer with three commissioners to be immediately appointed by the general assembly of the state of Delaware for the purpose of drafting uniform laws to regulate the catching and taking of fish in the Delaware river and [bay] the Bay of New Jersey between said two states, which said commissioners for each state respectively shall, within two years from the date of their appointment, report to the legislature of each of said states the  proposed laws so framed and recommended by said joint commission. Upon the adoption and passage of said laws so recommended by the respective legislatures of said two states, said laws shall constitute the sole laws for the regulation of the taking and catching of fish in the said river and bay between said states.  Said laws shall remain in force until altered, amended or repealed by concurrent legislation of the said two states.  Said commissioners shall also ascertain the dividing line between said river and bay, and upon each of the shores of said two states, where said dividing line extended shall intersect the same, shall, at the joint expense of said states, erect a suitable monument to mark the said dividing line.  Said dividing line between said monuments shall be the division line between the said river and bay for the interpretation of and for all purposes of this compact, and of the concurrent legislation provided for therein. The faith of the said contracting states is hereby pledged to the enactment of said laws so recommended by said commissioners, or to such concurrent legislation as may seem judicious and proper in the premises to the respective legislatures thereof. Each state shall have and exercise exclusive jurisdiction within said river to arrest, try and punish its own inhabitants for violations of the concurrent legislation relating to fishery herein provided for. (cf: P.L.1905, c. 42, Art. IV) 54.  Section 1 of P.L.1962, c.48 (C.App.A:9-51.5) is amended to read as follows: 1.    When the governing body of any municipality bordering on the Atlantic ocean or [Delaware bay] Bay of New Jersey shall find that there exists a threat or danger to life and property by reason of the damage to or the destruction of sand barriers and other natural or manmade barriers which protect the municipalities, and that it  is necessary to the health, safety and welfare of the municipality to repair, restore, replace or construct such protective barriers, such governing body may, by resolution, as an exercise of the police power of the State designate the properties required for the purpose of providing such protective barriers and authorize the appropriate municipal or governmental officials or agencies or the representatives thereof to enter immediately upon such property to take control and possession thereof, and to do such acts as may be required, including removing, destroying or otherwise disposing of any property located thereon without first paying any compensation therefor. Such resolution shall provide that no entry shall be made upon such property for a period of at least 10 days following the passage of such resolution, unless the governing body shall find that the public safety and interest requires that entry be made within a shorter period of time.  In such case, entry may be made after the expiration of such time period as shall be fixed by  the resolution. (cf: P.L.1962, c.48, s.1) 55.  This act shall take effect immediately.